Alaska, session 34, HB310.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF ALASKA: 03 * Section 1. AS 43.52 is amended by adding new sections to read: 04 Article 3. Bed Tax. 05 Sec. 43.52.300. Levy of bed tax. A tax of three percent of the amount of room 06 rent is imposed on a room rented for the purpose of lodging. 07 Sec. 43.52.310. Exemptions. The tax imposed under AS 43.52.300 does not 08 apply to a room rental 09 (1) that exceeds 30 days; 10 (2) for a federal or state official or employee, when the official or 11 employee is traveling on official business; or 12 (3) for an official or employee of a foreign government, when the 13 official or employee is traveling on official business, if imposition of the tax is 14 prohibited by federal law or treaty. 15 Sec. 43.52.320. Liability for payment of bed tax. (a) The tax imposed by 01 AS 43.52.300 02 (1) is due at the time room rent is paid; and 03 (2) shall be collected and paid to the department by the 04 (A) room rental network company that arranged or executed 05 the rental if the rental was arranged or executed through a room rental network; 06 or 07 (B) person who provides the rented room if the rental was not 08 arranged or executed through a room rental network. 09 (b) A room rental network company required to collect the tax imposed under 10 AS 43.52.300 shall register with the department. 11 Sec. 43.52.330. Relationship to municipal taxes. The tax imposed by 12 AS 43.52.300 is in addition to a room rental tax imposed by a municipality. 13 Sec. 43.52.350. Definitions. In AS 43.52.300 - 43.52.350, 14 (1) "room rent" means the amount paid as consideration for the use by 15 a person of a room in a hotel, motel, or other place of temporary lodging; 16 (2) "room rental network" means online-enabled software or an online- 17 enabled application, website, or other system offered or used by a room rental network 18 company that enables the prearrangement of room rentals with personal room owners. 19 * Sec. 2. This Act takes effect January 1, 2027. Welcome toThe Alaska State Legislature This web site is the place to track bills, locate and contact your legislators, and access committee information. Questions? Try our help wizard or call 907-465-4648. SMS Bill Tracking Text a bill number (ex: HB1) to 559-245-2529 to enroll in text alerts. You will receive an enrollment confirmation and instructions on how to stop receiving the alerts.